Vermont, session 2025-2026, S44.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 4652 is amended to read:
§ 4652. AUTHORIZATION TO ENTER INTO AGREEMENTS
PURSUANT TO 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) AND 19 U.S.C. § 1401(i)
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only the Governor, in
consultation with the Vermont Attorney General, is authorized to enter into,
modify, or extend an agreement pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) or 19 U.S.C.
§ 1401(i).
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a State, county, or
municipal law enforcement agency is authorized to enter into an agreement
pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) or 19 U.S.C. § 1401(i) when necessary to
address threats to the public safety or welfare of Vermont residents arising out
of a declaration of a State or national emergency No public agency, as that
term is defined in 1 V.S.A. § 317, or an officer, employee, agent, or
independent contractor of a public agency, shall enter into an agreement
pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) or 19 U.S.C. § 1401(i) unless the Governor has
authorized the agreement as set forth in subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 21, 2025
VT LEG #383911 v.1